Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1254
Simultaneous proceedings.

If a proceeding for enforcement under sections 43-1248 to 43-1264 is commenced in a court of this state and the court determines that a proceeding to modify the determination is pending in a court of another state having jurisdiction to modify the determination under sections 43-1238 to 43-1247, the enforcing court shall immediately communicate with the modifying court. The proceeding for enforcement continues unless the enforcing court, after consultation with the modifying court, stays or dismisses the proceeding.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 29.